Utah statutes.
79-5-501.   Grants -- Matching funds requirements -- Rules.
(1) (a)  The board may give grants to federal government agencies, state
agencies, or local governments for the planning, acquisition, and development
of trails within the state's recreational trail system with funds appropriated
by the Legislature for that purpose.
(b) (i)  Each grant recipient must provide matching funds having a value that
is equal to or greater than the grant funds received.
(ii)  The board may allow a grant recipient to provide property, material, or
labor in lieu of money, provided the grant recipient's contribution has a
value that is equal to or greater than the grant funds received.
(2)  The board shall:
(a)  make rules setting forth procedures and criteria for the awarding of
grants for recreational trails; and
(b)  determine to whom grant funds shall be awarded after considering the
recommendations of and after consulting with the council and the division.
(3)  Rules for the awarding of grants for recreational trails shall provide
that:
(a)  each grant applicant must solicit public comment on the proposed
recreational trail and submit a summary of that comment to the division;
(b)  each trail project for which grant funds are awarded must conform to the
criteria and guidelines specified in Sections 79-5-103, 79-5-301, and
79-5-302; and
(c)  trail proposals that include a plan to provide employment opportunities
for youth, including at-risk youth, in the development of the trail is
encouraged.
(4)  As used in this section, "at-risk youth" means youth who:
(a)  are subject to environmental forces, such as poverty or family
dysfunction, that may make them vulnerable to family, school, or community
problems;
(b)  perform poorly in school or have failed to complete high school;
(c)  exhibit behaviors that have the potential to harm themselves or others in
the community, such as truancy, use of alcohol or drugs, and associating with
delinquent peers; or
(d)  have already engaged in behaviors harmful to themselves or others in the
community.
